Alabama, session 2026rs, SB369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) There is created the Lauderdale County
Economic Development Authority. The authority is created for
the purpose and has the responsibility of aiding and assisting
current industries an retail establishments and coordinating
the efforts of all municipal and county agencies of Lauderdale
County as well as aiding organizations in the development of
new industries and retail establishments which will provide
job opportunities for the residents of Lauderdale County.
(b)(1) The authority shall be governed by a board of
directors consisting of five members. All five members shall
be appointed by the county commission. Vacancies on the board
shall be appointed by the same appointing authority that made
the initial appointment.
Page 1

the initial appointment.
SB369 INTRODUCED
(2) Each member shall serve for a term of four years.
Before August 1, 2026, the appointing authorities shall submit
in writing the name and address of the members of the board of
directors to the judge of probate and a record of the
appointments shall be filed and maintained in the office of
the judge of probate.
(3) The members shall elect from among themselves a
president, vice president, secretary, and treasurer. Each
officer of the board shall serve for a period of one year, or
until a successor is elected to serve. The officers of the
board shall not be bonded, except the treasurer, who shall
obtain a bond in a reasonable amount.
(4) The members of the board shall receive the same per
diem and mileage for actual attendance of meetings of the
board as allowed for state employees for up to 12 meetings in
any one year.
(c)(1) The authority may employ a qualified executive
director who shall be responsible for carrying forth the
policies and directives of the board of directors. The
executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the board.
The board of directors shall set the salary of the executive
director and shall provide necessary office space and clerical
help.
(2) The authority may solicit and receive contributions
from other governmental entities and public or private
corporations, partnerships, or individuals. The authority
shall submit to audits by the Department of Examiners of
Public Accounts.
Page 2

Public Accounts.
SB369 INTRODUCED
(d)(1) There is created the Lauderdale County Economic
Development Authority Fund.
(2) The Lauderdale County Economic Development
Authority Board of Trustees may expend the monies in the fund
for any lawful purpose that complies with the purposes of
subsection (a).
(e)(1) The Lauderdale County Commission may levy an
additional sales and use tax of up to three-quarters of one
percent on sales, use, storage, consumption, or gross
receipts.
(2) The gross receipts of any business and the gross
proceeds of all sales and use of products or services which
are presently exempt under the state sales and use tax
statutes are exempt from the taxes authorized by this section.
(3) The proceeds of any tax levied pursuant to this
subsection shall be deposited in the Lauderdale County
Economic Development Authority Fund.
(4) Any tax levied pursuant to this subsection shall be
administered in the same manner as the tax established in
Subpart 2 of Part 6 of Article 24 of Chapter 39 of Title 45,
Code of Alabama 1975.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3